azg.mor.twol
Alphabet

a b c d e ë f g h i j k l m n o ó p r s t u v x y z 

%{n%}:n
%{i%}:i
%>:0

;

Rules

"Sonorizaci'on ts (t)"
t:d <=> %{n%}: %>: _ ;

"Sonorizaci'on ts (s)"
s:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: t:d _ ;

"Elisión"
s:0 <=> %{i%}: %>:  _ ;

! k i > s n a
! k i 0 0 n a

! k i {n} > t s u e
! k i  n  0 d 0 u e 
